Utah statutes.
63I-1-273.   Repeal dates, Title 73.

(1)  Title 73, Chapter 27, State Water Development Commission, is repealed December 31, 2018.

(2)  The instream flow water right for trout habitat established in Subsection 73-3-30(3) is repealed December 31, 2018.



Amended by Chapter 148, 2008 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 311, 2008 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

